Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

12-5-330. Resources Advisory Board, Southeast River Basins.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 3, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1964, p. 244; Ga. L. 1965, p. 508,

§

1.

12-5-331. Duties and powers of department as to development of state's rivers.

The Department of Natural Resources shall negotiate with the proper authorities of the United States from time to time concerning the development of the rivers of Georgia with particular reference to flood control. The department shall be privileged to appear before committees of Congress concerning appropriations for river development, to gather and disseminate information, and to cooperate with the federal and state authorities toward the development of Georgia's rivers.

Such information pertinent to the development of Georgia's rivers as may be obtained by the Department of Natural Resources may be filed from time to time with the Department of Economic Development and, subject to approval of the Governor and the Secretary of State, with the Division of Archives and History.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 67, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 8; Ga. L. 2002, p. 532, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 10.)

Cross references.

- Powers and duties of department relating to projects for deepening, widening, and improving river channels for navigational and other purposes,

§

52-9-1

.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641,

§

18, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "In the event of any substantive conflict between this Act and any other Act of the 1989 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."